Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3903
International application of act.

A court of
this state may treat a foreign country as if it were a state for the purpose
of applying sections 30-3901 to 30-3917 and 30-3921 to 30-3923.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 7.